Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Terms of Employment Generally.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, §§ 14, 19.

§ 22.1-293.
School boards authorized to employ principals and assistant principals; license required; powers and duties.

A school board, upon recommendation of the division superintendent, may employ principals and assistant principals. Persons employed in these positions shall hold licenses as prescribed by the Board of Education.

A principal shall provide instructional leadership in, shall be responsible for the administration of, and shall supervise the operation and management of the school or schools and property to which he has been assigned, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the school board and under the supervision of the division superintendent.

A principal may submit recommendations to the division superintendent for the appointment, assignment, promotion, transfer, and dismissal of all personnel assigned to his supervision. Principals must have received training, provided pursuant to § 22.1-253.13:5, in the evaluation and documentation of employee performance, which evaluation and documentation shall include, but shall not be limited to, employee skills and knowledge and student academic progress, prior to submitting such recommendations. Assistant principals and other supervisory personnel participating in the evaluation and documentation of employee performance must also have received such training in the evaluation and documentation of employee performance.

A principal shall perform such other duties as may be assigned by the division superintendent pursuant to the rules and regulations of the school board.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.9; 1973, c. 223; 1980, c. 559; 1992, c. 132; 1999, cc. 1030, 1037; 2013, cc. 588, 650.

Cross references.

As to terms of employment of personnel for the Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, see § 22.1-349.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 1030 and 1037 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in subsection C, deleted “Beginning September 1, 2000” at the beginning of the second sentence, deleted the clause (i) designator preceding “Principals must have,” deleted the clause (ii) designator preceding “Assistant principals and,” and substituted “supervisory” for “administrative” preceding “personnel participating” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-294.
Probationary terms of service for principals, assistant principals, and supervisors; evaluation; reassigning principal, assistant principal, or supervisor to teaching position.

A person employed as a principal, assistant principal, or supervisor, including a person who has previously achieved continuing contract status as a teacher, shall serve a probationary term of three years in such position in the same school division before acquiring continuing contract status as principal, assistant principal, or supervisor. With such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly for such purpose, school boards shall provide each probationary principal, except probationary principals who have prior successful experience as principals, as determined by the local school board in a school division, a mentor, as described in guidelines developed by the Board, during the first year of the probationary period, to assist such probationary principal in achieving excellence in administration.

Each local school board shall adopt for use by the division superintendent clearly defined criteria for a performance evaluation process for principals, assistant principals, and supervisors that are consistent with the performance standards set forth in the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents as provided in § 22.1-253.13:5 and that includes, among other things, an assessment of such administrators’ skills and knowledge; student academic progress and school gains in student learning; and effectiveness in addressing school safety and enforcing student discipline. The division superintendent shall implement such performance evaluation process in making employment recommendations to the school board pursuant to § 22.1-293. Principals and assistant principals who have achieved continuing contract status shall be formally evaluated at least once every three years and evaluated informally at least once each year that they are not formally evaluated. Probationary principals and assistant principals shall be evaluated each school year. The division superintendent shall consider such evaluations, among other things, in making recommendations to the school board regarding the nonrenewal of the probationary contract of any principal or assistant principal.

Continuing contract status acquired by a principal, assistant principal, or supervisor shall not be construed (i) as prohibiting a school board from reassigning such principal, assistant principal, or supervisor to a teaching position if notice of reassignment is given by the school board by June 15 of any year or (ii) as entitling any such principal, assistant principal, or supervisor to the salary paid him as principal, assistant principal, or supervisor in the case of any such reassignment to a teaching position.

No such salary reduction and reassignment, however, shall be made without first providing such principal, assistant principal, or supervisor with written notice of the reason for such reduction and reassignment and an opportunity to present his or her position at an informal meeting with the division superintendent, the division superintendent’s designee, or the school board. Before recommending such reassignment, the division superintendent shall consider, among other things, the performance evaluations for such principal, assistant principal, or supervisor. The principal, assistant principal, or supervisor shall elect whether such meeting shall be with the division superintendent, the division superintendent’s designee, or the school board. The school board, division superintendent, or the division superintendent’s designee shall determine what processes are to be followed at the meeting. The decision to reassign and reduce salary shall be at the sole discretion of the school board.The intent of this section is to provide an opportunity for a principal, assistant principal, or supervisor to discuss the reasons for such salary reduction and reassignment with the division superintendent, his designee, or the school board, and the provisions of this section are meant to be procedural only. Nothing contained herein shall be taken to require cause, as defined in § 22.1-307, for the salary reduction and reassignment of a principal, assistant principal, or supervisor.

As used in this section, “supervisor” means a person who holds an instructional supervisory position as specified in the regulations of the Board of Education and who is required to hold a license as prescribed by the Board of Education.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.3; 1968, c. 691; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 3; 1976, cc. 191, 226; 1979, c. 275; 1980, c. 559; 1982, c. 47; 1992, c. 132; 1999, cc. 1030, 1037; 2005, cc. 331, 450; 2013, cc. 44, 109, 588, 650.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 1030 and 1037 are identical, and added the subsection B; and substituted “15” for “fifteenth.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 331 and 450 are identical, and inserted “are consistent with the performance objectives set forth in the Guidelines for Uniform Peformance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Administrators, and Superintendents as provided in § 22.1-253.13:5 and that” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 44 and 109 are identical, and substituted “June 15” for “April 15” in clause (i) of subsection C, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “a probationary term of” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence; in subsection B, substituted “standards” for “objectives” and “Principals” for “Administrators”, and added the last three sentences; substituted “June 15” for “April 15” in clause C (i); inserted the second sentence in subsection D; substituted “an instructional” for “a” in subsection E; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Education Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2013).

§ 22.1-295.
Employment of teachers.

The teachers in the public schools of a school division shall be employed and placed in appropriate schools by the school board upon recommendation of the division superintendent. In placing teachers, school boards shall fill positions with licensed instructional personnel qualified in the relevant subject areas.

School boards shall adopt employment policies and practices designed to promote the employment and retention of highly qualified teachers and to effectively serve the educational needs of students. Such policies shall include, but need not be limited to, incentives for excellence in teaching, including financial support for teachers attending professional development seminars or those seeking and obtaining national certification.

School boards shall develop a procedure for use by division superintendents and principals in evaluating teachers that is appropriate to the tasks performed and addresses, among other things, student academic progress and the skills and knowledge of instructional personnel, including, but not limited to, instructional methodology, classroom management, and subject matter knowledge.Teachers employed by local school boards who have achieved continuing contract status shall be formally evaluated at least once every three years and more often as deemed necessary by the principal, and they shall be evaluated informally during each year in which they are not formally evaluated. Any teacher who has achieved continuing contract status who receives an unsatisfactory formal evaluation and who continues to be employed by the local school board shall be formally evaluated in the following year. The evaluation shall be maintained in the employee’s personnel file.Each local superintendent shall annually certify divisionwide compliance with the provisions of this section to the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-203; 1980, c. 559; 1996, c. 186; 1999, cc. 831, 1030, 1037; 2006, c. 373; 2013, cc. 588, 650.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 831, 1030, and 1037 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A; and added the last two sentences in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 373 substituted “highly qualified teachers” for “the highest quality instructional personnel” in the first sentence in subsection B; inserted the subsection C designation; and added the second and third paragraphs in subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “teachers” for “instructional personnel” or similar language in the first two paragraphs, substituted “formally evaluated at least once every three years and more often as deemed necessary by the principal, and they shall be evaluated informally during each year in which they are not formally evaluated” for “evaluated not less than once every three years” in the first sentence of the second paragraph, and rewrote the second sentence, which read, “Any instructional personnel, who has achieved continuing contract status, receiving an unsatisfactory evaluation who continues to be employed by the local school board shall be evaluated no later than one year after receiving such unsatisfactory evaluation.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Education Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2013).

§ 22.1-295.1.
Employee personnel files; maintenance of employee records; confidentiality of certain records.

Personnel files of all school board employees may be produced and maintained in digital or paper format.

Information determined to be unfounded after a reasonable administrative review shall not be maintained in any employee personnel file, but may be retained in a separate sealed file by the administration if such information alleges civil or criminal offenses. Any dispute over such unfounded information exclusive of opinions retained in the personnel file, or in a separate sealed file, notwithstanding the provisions of the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act (§

2.2-3800

et seq.), shall be settled through the employee grievance procedure as provided in §§ 22.1-306 and 22.1-308 through 22.1-314.

Teacher performance indicators or other data collected by or for the Department of Education or the local school board or made available to and able to be used by the local school board to judge the performance or quality of a teacher, maintained in a teacher’s personnel file or otherwise, shall be confidential but may be disclosed, in a form that does not personally identify any student or other teacher, (i) pursuant to court order, (ii) for the purposes of a grievance proceeding involving the teacher, or (iii) as otherwise required by state or federal law. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the release or to limit the availability of nonidentifying, aggregate teacher performance indicators or other data.

History.

1987, c. 506; 2006, c. 191; 2013, c. 291; 2016, c. 390.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 191 added subsection A and inserted the subsection B designation.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 291, in subsection B, substituted “Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act” for “Privacy Protection Act, Chapter 38,” and deleted “of Title 2.2” preceding “shall be settled” in the second sentence; and added subsection C.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 390 inserted “collected by or for the Department of Education or the local school board or made available to and able to be” and “in a form that does not personally identify any student or other teacher” in subsection C.

§ 22.1-295.2.
Employment discrimination prohibited.

As used in this section:

“Age”
means being an individual who is at least 40 years of age.

“Military status”
means status as (i) a member of the uniformed forces, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(a)(5), of the United States or a reserve component thereof named under 10 U.S.C. § 10101, (ii) a veteran as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2), or (iii) a dependent as defined in 50 U.S.C. § 3911(4) except that the support provided by the service member to the individual shall have been provided 180 days immediately preceding an alleged action that if proven true would constitute unlawful discrimination under this section instead of 180 days immediately preceding an application for relief under 50 U.S.C. Chapter 50.

“Religion”
includes any outward expression of religious faith, including adherence to religious dressing and grooming practices and the carrying or display of religious items or symbols.

No school board or any agent or employee thereof shall discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, age, marital status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or military status.

The provisions of this section shall not prohibit (i) discrimination in employment on the basis of sex or age in those instances when sex or age is a bona fide occupational qualification for employment or (ii) providing preference in employment to veterans.

History.

2020, cc. 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477, 478; 2022, c. 799.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “For the purposes of this section, ‘age’ means being an individual who is at least 40 years of age”; and substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 799 added the definition of “Religion” in subsection A.

§ 22.1-296.
Payment of employees; reimbursement for private transportation; certain sick leave policies.

Each school board shall provide for the payment of teachers, principals, assistant principals, and other employees monthly, semimonthly, or biweekly, as may be determined by the school board.However, school boards setting the school calendar so that the first day students are required to attend occurs prior to August 15 shall establish a payment schedule to ensure that all contract personnel are compensated for time worked within the first month of employment.

All school board employees may be reimbursed for private transportation at a rate not to exceed that which is authorized for persons traveling on state business in accordance with §

2.2-2825

. Whatever rate is paid, however, shall be the same for school board members and employees of the board.

Each local school board shall adopt policies providing for leave without pay for school board employees with debilitating or life-threatening illness or injury, without regard to the employee’s length of service with the school board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-57.2, 22-72; 1954, c. 289; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 60; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 691; 1968, c. 139; 1970, c. 71; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 511; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1980, c. 559; 1998, c. 872; 2003, cc. 531, 557; 2005, c. 486; 2019, cc. 569, 570.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 531 added a second paragraph in subsection A, which read: “However, school boards receiving a waiver from the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-79.1 and setting the school calendar so that the first day students are required to attend occurs before August 15 shall establish a payment schedule to ensure that all contract personnel are compensated for time worked within the first month of employment.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 557 added the second paragraph as set out in subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 486 added subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 569 and 570 are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection A, deleted “receiving a waiver from the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-79.1 and” following “school boards”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 22.1-296.1.
Data on convictions for certain crimes and child abuse and neglect required; penalty.

As a condition of employment for all of its public school employees, whether full-time or part-time, permanent, or temporary, every school board shall require on its application for employment certification of whether the applicant has been convicted of any violent felony set forth in the definition of barrier crime in subsection A of §

19.2-392.02

; any offense involving the sexual molestation, physical or sexual abuse, or rape of a child; or any crime of moral turpitude. Any individual making a materially false statement regarding any such offense is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and, in the case of a teacher, upon conviction, the fact of such conviction is grounds for the Board to revoke his license to teach.

No school board shall employ any individual who has been convicted of any violent felony set forth in the definition of barrier crime in subsection A of §

19.2-392.02

or any offense involving the sexual molestation, physical or sexual abuse, or rape of a child.

Any school board may employ any individual who has been convicted of any felony or crime of moral turpitude that is not set forth in the definition of barrier crime in subsection A of §

19.2-392.02

and does not involve the sexual molestation, physical or sexual abuse, or rape of a child, provided that in the case of a felony conviction, such individual has had his civil rights restored by the Governor.

Every school board shall also require on its application for employment, as a condition of employment requiring direct contact with students, whether full-time or part-time, permanent, or temporary, certification that the applicant has not been the subject of a founded case of child abuse and neglect. Any person making a materially false statement regarding a finding of child abuse and neglect is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and upon conviction, the fact of said conviction is grounds for the Board of Education to revoke such person’s license to teach.

As a condition of awarding a contract for the provision of services that require the contractor or his employees to have direct contact with students on school property during regular school hours or during school-sponsored activities, the school board shall require the contractor to provide certification of whether any individual who will provide such services has been convicted of any violent felony set forth in the definition of barrier crime in subsection A of §

19.2-392.02

; any offense involving the sexual molestation, physical or sexual abuse, or rape of a child; or any crime of moral turpitude.Any individual making a materially false statement regarding any such offense is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, the fact of such conviction is grounds for the revocation of the contract to provide such services and, when relevant, the revocation of any license required to provide such services. School boards shall not be liable for materially false statements regarding the certifications required by this subsection.This subsection shall not apply to a contractor or his employees providing services to a school division in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when student health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed on an urgent basis to ensure that school facilities are safe and habitable, when it is reasonably anticipated that the contractor or his employees will have no direct contact with students.

No school board shall award a contract for the provision of services that require the contractor or his employees to have direct contact with students on school property during regular school hours or during school-sponsored activities when any individual who provides such services has been convicted of any violent felony set forth in the definition of barrier crime in subsection A of §

19.2-392.02

or any offense involving the sexual molestation, physical or sexual abuse, or rape of a child.

Any school board may award a contract for the provision of services that require the contractor or his employees to have direct contact with students on school property during regular school hours or during school-sponsored activities when any individual who provides such services has been convicted of any felony or crime of moral turpitude that is not set forth in the definition of barrier crime in subsection A of §

19.2-392.02

and does not involve the sexual molestation, physical or sexual abuse, or rape of a child, provided that in the case of a felony conviction, such individual has had his civil rights restored by the Governor.

History.

1985, c. 487; 1987, c. 359; 1996, c. 960; 1997, c. 103; 2003, c. 723; 2006, c. 790; 2007, cc. 245, 431; 2008, c. 555; 2020, c. 877.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to requirements related to employment of professional, licensed personnel, see § 22.1-349.9.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 833 and 843 provide: “§ 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of § 22.1-296.1 of the Code of Virginia and consistent with the discretion granted to a school board pursuant to § 22.1-307 of the Code of Virginia to retain an employee who is convicted of an offense subsequent to the employee’s hiring, a school board may employ an individual who, at the time of the individual’s hiring, has been convicted of a felony, provided that such individual (i) was employed in good standing by a school board on or before December 17, 2015; (ii) has been granted a simple pardon for such offense by the Governor or other appropriate authority; and (iii) has had his civil rights restored by the Governor or other appropriate authority. However, a school board may employ, until July 1, 2020, such an individual who does not satisfy the conditions set forth in clauses (ii) and (iii), provided that such individual has been continuously employed by the school board from December 17, 2015, through July 1, 2018.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 723, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designator and deleted “a crime of moral turpitude” following “convicted of a felony” therein, and added “and (ii) whether the applicant has been convicted of a crime of moral turpitude.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 790 added subsection C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 245 and 431 are identical, and rewrote subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 555 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 877 rewrote the section.

§ 22.1-296.2.
Fingerprinting required; reciprocity permitted.

As a condition of employment, the school boards of the Commonwealth shall require any applicant who is offered or accepts employment, whether full time or part time or permanent or temporary, to submit to fingerprinting and to provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the applicant’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding such applicant. The school board may (i) pay for all or a portion of the cost of the fingerprinting or criminal records check or (ii) in its discretion, require the applicant to pay for all or a portion of the cost of such fingerprinting or criminal records check.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an applicant’s record or notification that no record exists, shall report to the school board whether or not the applicant has ever been convicted of a felony or a Class 1 misdemeanor or an equivalent offense in another state.

To conserve the costs of conducting criminal history record checks to applicants and school boards, upon the written request and permission of the applicant, a school board shall inform another school board with which reciprocity has been established, and to which the applicant also has applied for employment, of the results of the criminal history record information conducted within the previous 90 days that it obtained concerning the applicant. Criminal history record information pertaining to an applicant for employment by a school board shall be exchanged only between school boards in the Commonwealth in which a current agreement of reciprocity for the exchange of such information has been established and is in effect. Reciprocity agreements between school boards shall provide for the apportionment of the costs of the fingerprinting or criminal records check between the applicant and the school board, as prescribed in this section. However, school boards that enter into reciprocity agreements shall not each levy the costs of the fingerprinting or criminal records check on the applicant.

The division superintendent shall inform the relevant school board of any notification of arrest of a school board employee received pursuant to §

19.2-83.1

. The school board shall require such employee, whether full time or part time or permanent or temporary, to submit to fingerprinting and to provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the employee’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding such employee. The school board may (i) pay for all or a portion of the cost of the fingerprinting or criminal records check or (ii) in its discretion, require the applicant to pay for all or a portion of the cost of such fingerprinting or criminal records check.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an employee’s record or notification that no record exists, shall report to the school board whether or not the employee has been convicted of any of the offenses listed in subsection A. The contents of the employee’s record shall be used by the school board solely to implement the provisions of §§ 22.1-307 and 22.1-315.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall not disclose information to the school board regarding charges or convictions of any crimes not specified in this section. If an applicant is denied employment or a current employee is suspended or dismissed because of information appearing on his criminal history record, the school board shall provide a copy of the information obtained from the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the applicant or employee. The information provided to the school board shall not be disseminated except as provided in this section.

History.

1988, c. 851; 1989, c. 544; 1990, c. 766; 1991, c. 342; 1992, cc. 641, 791; 1993, cc. 210, 458; 1994, cc. 232, 782; 1995, cc. 731, 781, 809; 1996, cc. 396, 467; 1997, cc. 444, 721; 1998, c. 412; 1999, c. 448; 2000, cc. 683, 774, 811; 2001, cc. 591, 677; 2022, c. 355.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to requirements related to employment of professional, licensed personnel, see § 22.1-349.9.

Editor’s note.

Clause 2 of Acts 1988, c. 851 provided that the act would expire July 1, 1990. However, Acts 1990, c. 766 repealed the expiration.

Acts
2022, c. 355, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act that amend
§ 22.1-296.2 of the Code of Virginia shall not be construed to require, as a condition of employment by a school board, any applicant who was offered or accepted employment on or before July 1, 1989, whether full time or part time or permanent or temporary, to submit to fingerprinting and to provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the applicant's fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding such applicant.”

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, in the first paragraph, inserted “Lancaster” following “Isle of Wight,” inserted Mecklenburg” following “Louisa,” substituted “Westmoreland, and York” for “and Westmoreland,” and inserted “Manassas Park” following “Manassas.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 683, rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “of any school division designated in subsection A of this section” following “division superintendent,” deleted “however, such employee may be required to pay the cost of such fingerprinting or criminal records check at the discretion of the school board. From such funds as may be available for this purpose” following “such employee” in the second sentence, and in the last sentence, inserted the clause (i) designator, inserted “all or a portion of the cost of,” inserted “or” at the end of clause (i), and added clause (ii).

The 2000 amendments by cc. 774 and 811 are identical, and added “Floyd” to the list of counties deleted by c. 683 in subsection A.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 591 substituted “or a Class 1 misdemeanor” for “a misdemeanor involving (i) sexual assault as established in Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, (ii) obscenity and related offenses as established in Article 5 (§

18.2-372

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 18.2, (iii) drugs as established in Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, (iv) moral turpitude, or (v) the physical or sexual abuse or neglect of a child” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2001 amendment by c. 677 added the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “after July 1, 1989” preceding “whether” in subsection A in the first paragraph; in subsections A and B in the first paragraphs, substituted “full time or part time or permanent or temporary” for “full-time or part-time, permanent, or temporary”; deleted “of this section” in subsection B in the second paragraph in the first sentence at the end; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).